Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.140

Washington State University—Moneys paid into general fund for support of.

There shall be paid into the state general fund for the support of Washington State University the following moneys:

(1)—All moneys collected from the lease or rental of lands set apart by the enabling act or otherwise for the agricultural college and school of science;

(2)—All interest or income arising from the proceeds of the sale of any of such lands;

(3)—All moneys received or collected as interest on deferred payments on contracts for the sale of such lands.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.140. Prior: 1905 c 43 s 2; RRS s 5521.]